Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2708
Receipts; to what funds credited; disbursement of costs in criminal cases.

All money arising from fines and recognizances shall be credited by the county treasurer to the county school fund except as provided by Article VII, section 5, Constitution of Nebraska, and the costs and proceeds of jail labor shall be credited to the county general fund. Whenever any costs in any criminal case are paid from the county treasury, such payment shall be made from the county general fund; and when any warrant is drawn by the county clerk upon the treasurer of the county for the payment of such costs, a true record of the same and the definite purpose of every such warrant shall be recorded in the clerk's office showing the cause in which such costs are paid.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 540, p. 842;

R.S.1913, § 9244;

C.S.1922, § 10273;

C.S.1929, § 29-2708;

R.S.1943, § 29-2708;

Laws 1959, c. 125, § 1, p. 459;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 9.

This section recognizes the constitutional requirement for disposition of fines, penalties, and license money. School Dist. No. 54 v. School Dist. of Omaha, 171 Neb. 769, 107 N.W.2d 744 (1961).